Utah statutes.
54-8b-13.   Rules governing operator assisted services.
(1)  The commission shall make rules to implement the following requirements
pertaining to the provision of operator assisted services:
(a)  Rates, surcharges, terms, or conditions for operator assisted services
shall be provided to customers upon request without charge.
(b)  A customer shall be made aware, prior to incurring any charges, of the
identity of the operator service provider handling the operator assisted call
by a form of signage placed on or near the telephone or by verbal
identification by the operator service provider.
(c)  Any contract between an operator service provider and an aggregator shall
contain language which assures that any person making a telephone call on any
telephone owned or controlled by the aggregator or operator service provider
can access:
(i)  where technically feasible, any other operator service provider operating
in the relevant geographic area; and
(ii)  the public safety emergency telephone numbers for the jurisdiction where
the aggregator's telephone service is geographically located.
(d)  No operator service provider shall transfer a call to another operator
service provider unless that transfer is accomplished at, and billed from, the
call's place of origin.  If such a transfer is not technically possible, the
operator service provider shall inform the caller that the call cannot be
transferred as requested and that the caller should hang up and attempt to
reach another operator service provider through the means provided by that
other operator service provider.
(2) (a)  The Division of Public Utilities shall be responsible for enforcing
any rule adopted by the commission under this section.
(b)  If the Division of Public Utilities determines that any person, or any
officer or employee of any person, is violating any rule adopted under this
section, the division shall serve written notice upon the alleged violator
which:
(i)  specifies the violation;
(ii)  alleges the facts constituting the violation; and
(iii)  specifies the corrective action to be taken.
(c)  After serving notice as required in Subsection (2)(b), the division may
request the commission to issue an order to show cause.  After a hearing, the
commission may impose penalties and, if necessary, may request the attorney
general to enforce the order in district court.
(3) (a)  Any person who violates any rule made under this section or fails to
comply with any order issued pursuant to this section is subject to a penalty
not to exceed $2,000 per violation.
(b)  In the case of a continuing violation, each day that the violation
continues constitutes a separate and distinct offense.
(4)  A penalty assessment under this section does not relieve the person
assessed from civil liability for claims arising out of any act which was a
violation of any rule under this section.
